src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON INTERNÆHTTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -æhtta with long and short compound-form: -ET IN SWEDISH, -ETT in norwegian. Differs from ALFABIEHTTA because -ehtta isn't used in NOR.
 +CmpNP/Pref+Area/NO+Cmp/Unass:ett%> R                          ;
 +CmpNP/Pref+Area/SE+Cmp/Unass:et%>  R                          ;
                              :æhtta MUORRAInfl                 ;
                              :æhtta MUORRACmp                  ;

             +Err/Orth+Area/NO:ett   A_CMP_INFL                 ; ! makes old internetta
             +Err/Orth+Area/SE:et    A_CMP_INFL                 ; ! makes old interneta
                     +Err/Orth:ehtta ERR/ORTH_EVEN_STRONG_CASES ; !Not possible with e in third grade


!!€gt-norm: intranæhtta # Even-syllable test
!!€ intranæhtta:                 intranæhtta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ intranähtta:                 intranæhtta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ intranehtas:                 intranæhtta+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON TABLÆHTTA
 +OLang/NOB: TABLÆHTTA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON TABLÆHTTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -æhtta with long and short compound-form. -ETT in both norwegian and in swedish.

                      :æhtta MUORRAInfl                 ;
                      :æhtta MUORRACmp                  ;

 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:ett%> R                          ;
             +Err/Orth:ett   A_CMP_INFL                 ; ! makes old tabeletta
             +Err/Orth:ehtta ERR/ORTH_EVEN_STRONG_CASES ; !Not possible with e in third grade


!!€gt-norm: kvartæhtta # Even-syllable test
!!€ kvartæhtta:                 kvartæhtta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ kvartähtta:                 kvartæhtta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ kvartehtas:                 kvartæhtta+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON INSTITUHTTA
 +OLang/NOB: INSTITUHTTA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON INSTITUHTTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -uhtta, with long and short compound-form on -utt(NOR)/-ut(SWE). The swedish -ut also gets uvtta, as ANTIHKKA-antijkka, but instituhtta is also used in sweden, so no Area/NO tag. 

 +CmpNP/Pref+Area/NO+Cmp/Unass:tt%> R          ;
 +CmpNP/Pref+Area/SE+Cmp/Unass:t%>  R          ;
                              :htta MUORRAInfl ;
                              :htta MUORRACmp  ;
                      +Area/SE:vtta MUORRAInfl ;
                      +Area/SE:vtta MUORRACmp  ;

             +Err/Orth+Area/NO:utt  A_CMP_INFL ; ! makes old institutta
             +Err/Orth+Area/NO:ut   A_CMP_INFL ; ! makes old instituta

!!€gt-norm: minuhtta # Even-syllable test
!!€ minuhtta:                 minuhtta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ minuvtta:                 minuhtta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ minuhtas:                 minuhtta+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ minuvtas:                 minuhtta+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON SATELIHTTA
 +OLang/NOB: SATELIHTTA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON SATELIHTTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ihtta, with long and short compound-form on -itt(NOR)/-it(SWE). The swedish -it also gets ijtta, as ANTIHKKA-antijkka, but satelihtta is also used in sweden, so no Area/NO tag. 

  +CmpNP/Pref+Area/NO+Cmp/Unass:tt%>     R                    ;
  +CmpNP/Pref+Area/SE+Cmp/Unass:t%>      R                    ;
                               :htta     MUORRAInfl           ;
                               :htta     MUORRACmp            ; 
                       +Area/SE:jtta     MUORRAInfl           ;
                       +Area/SE:jtta     MUORRACmp            ; 
              +Err/Orth+Area/NO:tt       A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old satelitta
              +Err/Orth+Area/NO:t        A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old satelita

!!€gt-norm: inuihtta # Even-syllable test
!!€ inuihtta:                 inuihtta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ inuijtta:                 inuihtta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ inuihtas:                 inuihtta+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ inuijtas:                 inuihtta+N+Sg+Ela


LEXICON APOTIEHKKA
 +OLang/NOB: APOTIEHKKA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON APOTIEHKKA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -iehkka in NOR, -æhkka in SWE. -ehkka as sub. With long and short compound-form on -k. See comments about the -ie/-e dialtags in ALFABIEHTTA.

 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:eks%>  R                          ; !short cmp
              +Area/NO:iehkka MUORRAInfl                 ;
              +Area/NO:iehkka MUORRACmp                  ;
              +Area/SE:æhkka  MUORRAInfl                 ;
              +Area/SE:æhkka  MUORRACmp                  ;
              
             +Err/Orth:ehkka  ERR/ORTH_EVEN_STRONG_CASES ; !! old "apotehkka" (long e not allowed in grad III, even though it's in dictionaries it's wrong)
             +Err/Orth:%>     A_CMP_INFL                 ; ! makes the old "apoteka"

               
!!€gt-norm: kartotiehkka # Even-syllable test
!!€ kartotähkka:                 kartotiehkka+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ kartotehkas:                 kartotiehkka+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ kartotiehkka:                kartotiehkka+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ kartotiehkas:                kartotiehkka+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ANTIHKKA
 +OLang/NOB: ANTIHKKA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON ANTIHKKA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -hkka in Norway, both -ijkka and -hkka are used in Sweden (Antik vs antikk). With long and short compound-form on -kk/-k. The swedish forms were earlier added to stems for the Swedish version, but now added here.

                            :hkka     MUORRAInfl           ;
                            :hkka     MUORRACmp            ; 
                    +Area/SE:jkka     MUORRAInfl           ;
                    +Area/SE:jkka     MUORRACmp            ;   
         +CmpNP/Pref+Area/NO+Cmp/Unass:kk%>     R                    ;
  +CmpNP/Pref+Area/SE+Cmp/Unass:k%>      R                    ;
 
          +Err/Orth+Area/NO:%>kk     A_CMP_INFL           ; !makes old "antikka"
          +Err/Orth+Area/SE:%>k      A_CMP_INFL           ; !makes old "apotika"
  
 

!!€gt-norm: dialektihkka # Even-syllable test
!!€ dialektihkka:                 dialektihkka+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ dialektihkas:                 dialektihkka+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ dialektijkka:                 dialektihkka+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ dialektijkas:                 dialektihkka+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON SEMINÁRRA
 +OLang/NOB: SEMINÁRRA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON SEMINÁRRA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -árra with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:ar%>     R                    ;
            :árra     MUORRAInfl           ;
            :árra     MUORRACmp            ; 
   +Err/Orth:ar       A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old seminara


!!€gt-norm: hektárra # Even-syllable test
!!€ hektárra:                 hektárra+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ hektáras:                 hektárra+N+Sg+Ela


LEXICON AREÁLLA
 +OLang/NOB: AREÁLLA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON AREÁLLA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -álla with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:al%>      R                    ;
            :álla      MUORRAInfl           ;
            :álla      MUORRACmp            ; 
   +Err/Orth:%>al      A_CMP_INFL           ; !makes old "areala"

!!€gt-norm: gasskavokálla # Even-syllable test
!!€ gasskavokálla:                 gasskavokálla+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ gasskavokálas:                 gasskavokálla+N+Sg+Ela


LEXICON AMBASSADERRA
 +OLang/NOB: AMBASSADERRA_CMP_INFL ;
