src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
ambassaderra+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ambassad AMBASSADERRA ; !
apotiehkka+Err/Orth+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:apod APOTIEHKKA ; ! !Used in Anta Pirak
artotiehkka+N+Sem/Obj:artot APOTIEHKKA ;
attribuhtta+N+Sem/Cat:at^tribu INSTITUHTTA ;
audio-visuálla+N+Sem/Dummytag:audio-visu^ AREÁLLA ;
bajemusingenerra+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bajemus#ingen AMBASSADERRA ;
bibliotekárra+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bibliotek SEMINÁRRA ; !
bibliotiehkka+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Build_Org:bibliot APOTIEHKKA ; !
billæhtta+N+Area/SE+Sem/Obj-ling:bilj TABLÆHTTA ; !
biseksuálla+N+Sem/Hum:bi#seksu^ AREÁLLA ;
báddekeramihkka+N+Sem/Mat:bádde#kerami ANTIHKKA ;
bæssásjfestiválla+N+Sem/Event:bæssásj#festiv AREÁLLA ;
cinematiehkka+N+Sem/Plc:cinemat APOTIEHKKA ;
denárra+N+Sem/Curr:den SEMINÁRRA ; !
direkterra+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:direkt AMBASSADERRA ; !
diskotiehkka+N+Sem/Plc:diskot APOTIEHKKA ; !
diskæhtta+N+Sem/Obj:disk TABLÆHTTA ;
dokumentárra+N+Area/NO+Sem/Prod-vis:dokument SEMINÁRRA ;
duodjeinstituhtta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:duodje#in^stitu INSTITUHTTA ;
dutkammateriálla+N+Sem/Dummytag:dutkam#materi^ AREÁLLA ;
dynamihtta+N+Sem/Substnc:dynami SATELIHTTA ;
dájdapolitihkka+N+Sem/Domain:dájda#politi ANTIHKKA ;
eksemplárra+N+Area/SE+Sem/Obj_Txt:exempl SEMINÁRRA ;
eksterierra+N+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Buildpart:exteri^ AMBASSADERRA ;
fiebargiehpedimtablæhtta+N+Sem/Food-med:fiebar#giehpedim#tabl TABLÆHTTA ;
fijnnamotorihkka+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Feat:fijnna#motori ANTIHKKA ;
finihtta+N+Sem/Cat:fini SATELIHTTA ;
fototiehkka+N+Sem/Plc-abstr:fotot APOTIEHKKA ;
glyptotiehkka+N+Sem/Plc:glyptot APOTIEHKKA ;
grammatihkka+N+Sem/Cat+Err/Orth:grámmáti ANTIHKKA ;
hektárra+N+Sem/Measr:hekt SEMINÁRRA ; !
hospitálla+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:hospit AREÁLLA ;
hypotiehkka+N+Sem/Dummytag:hypot APOTIEHKKA ;
iemegierggemylonihtta+N+Sem/Mat:ieme#giergge#myloni SATELIHTTA ;
ingenerra+N+Err/Orth+Area/NO+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:insjin AMBASSADERRA ; !
instituhtta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:in^stitu INSTITUHTTA ; !
inuihtta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:inu^i SATELIHTTA ; !
inventárra+N+Sem/Part:invent SEMINÁRRA ;
javllamusihkka+N+Sem/Dummytag:javlla#musi ANTIHKKA ;
kassæhtta+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Obj:kás TABLÆHTTA ;
kinotiehkka+N+Sem/Org:kinot APOTIEHKKA ;
kommenderra+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:kommend AMBASSADERRA ;
konjunksjonálla+N+Area/NO+Sem/Dummytag:konjunksjon AREÁLLA ; ! GG
konvoluhtta+N+Sem/Dummytag:konvolu INSTITUHTTA ;
kotelæhtta+N+Sem/Food:kotel TABLÆHTTA ;
kredihtta+N+Sem/Money:kredi SATELIHTTA ;
kubihkka+N+Sem/Dummytag:kubi ANTIHKKA ;
kvartsihtta+N+Sem/Dummytag:kvartsi SATELIHTTA ;
lasaræhtta+N+Sem/Dummytag:lasar TABLÆHTTA ;
lavuárra+N+Sem/Dummytag:lavu SEMINÁRRA ;
magnetihtta+N+Sem/Dummytag:magneti SATELIHTTA ;
mansjæhtta+N+Sem/Dummytag:mansj TABLÆHTTA ;
meteorihtta+N+Sem/Plc:mete^ori SATELIHTTA ; !
miehttsejåhtulakpolitihkka+N+Sem/Domain:miehttse#jåhtulak#politi ANTIHKKA ;
minerálla+N+Sem/Mat:miner AREÁLLA ; !
minuhtta+N+Sem/Measr_Time:minu INSTITUHTTA ; !
mylonihtta+N+Sem/Dummytag:myloni SATELIHTTA ;
næhtta+N+Sem/Dummytag:n TABLÆHTTA ;
observaterra+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:observa^t AMBASSADERRA ;
ornamentihkka+N+Sem/Domain+Err/Orth:ornámenti ANTIHKKA ;
pennálla+N+Sem/Ctain:penn AREÁLLA ; !
proletárra+N+Area/NO+Sem/Dummytag:prolet SEMINÁRRA ;
rakæhtta+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Veh:rake INSTITUHTTA ; !
redakterra+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:redakt AMBASSADERRA ;
rekruhtta+N+Area/NO+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:re^kru INSTITUHTTA ;
saluhtta+N+Sem/Dummytag:salu INSTITUHTTA ;
satelihtta+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Obj-el:satelli SATELIHTTA ;
semantihkka+N+Sem/Domain:semanti ANTIHKKA ; !
servituhtta+N+Sem/Dummytag:servitu INSTITUHTTA ;
serviæhtta+N+Area/NO+Sem/Dummytag:servi^ TABLÆHTTA ;
sigárra+N+Area/NO+Sem/Obj:sig SEMINÁRRA ; ! GG
sijddomateriálla+N+Sem/Dummytag:sijddo#materi^ AREÁLLA ;
siluæhtta+N+Sem/Dummytag:silu^ TABLÆHTTA ;
sivilingenerra+N+Err/Orth+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:civil#ingenj AMBASSADERRA ; !
snackbárra+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:snack#b SEMINÁRRA ; !
substituhtta+N+Sem/Dummytag:sub^stitu INSTITUHTTA ;
tablæhtta+N+Sem/Food-med:tabl TABLÆHTTA ; !
unneplågopolitihkka+N+Sem/Domain:unnep#lågo#politi ANTIHKKA ;
videotiehkka+N+Sem/Build:videot APOTIEHKKA ; !
vokálla+N+Sem/Dummytag:vok AREÁLLA ;
vuolepdirekterra+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vuolep#direkt AMBASSADERRA ;
